Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-33] Powers and duties, generally.
(a) The corporation may develop fee simple or leasehold property, construct
dwelling units thereon, including condominiums, planned units, and cluster
developments, and sell, lease, or rent or cause to be leased or rented, at the
lowest possible price to qualified residents, nonprofit organizations, or
government agencies, with an eligible developer or in its own behalf:

(1) Fully completed dwelling units with the
appropriate interest in the land on which the dwelling unit is located;

(2) Dwelling units that are substantially complete
and habitable with the appropriate interest in the land on which the dwelling
unit is located; or

(3) The land with site improvements (other than the
dwelling unit) either partially or fully developed.

(b) The corporation shall require all
applicants for the purchase of dwelling units to make application therefor
under oath, and may require additional testimony or evidence under oath in
connection with any application. The determination of any applicant's
eligibility under this chapter by the corporation shall be conclusive as to all
persons thereafter dealing with the property; provided that the making of any
false statement knowingly by the applicant or other person to the corporation
in connection with any application shall constitute perjury and be punishable
as such. The corporation shall establish a system to determine preferences by
lot in the event that it receives more qualified applications than it has
dwelling units available.

(c) The corporation shall adopt, pursuant to
chapter 91, rules on health, safety, building, planning, zoning, and land use
that relate to the development, subdivision, and construction of dwelling units
in housing projects in which the State, through the corporation, shall
participate. The rules shall not contravene any safety standards or tariffs
approved by the public utilities commission, and shall follow existing law as
closely as is consistent with the production of lower cost housing with standards
that meet minimum requirements of good design, pleasant amenities, health,
safety, and coordinated development.

When adopted, the rules shall have the force
and effect of law and shall supersede, for all housing projects in which the
State, through the corporation, shall participate, all other inconsistent laws,
ordinances, and rules relating to the use, zoning, planning, and development of
land, and the construction of dwelling units thereon. The rules, before
becoming effective, shall be presented to the legislative body of each county
in which they will be effective and the legislative body of any county may
within forty-five days approve or disapprove, for that county, any or all of
the rules by a majority vote of its members. On the forty-sixth day after
submission, any rules not disapproved shall be deemed to have been approved by
the county.

(d) The corporation may acquire, by eminent
domain, exchange, or negotiation, land or property required within the
foreseeable future for the purposes of this chapter. Whenever land with a
completed or substantially complete and habitable dwelling or dwellings thereon
is acquired by exchange or negotiation, the exchange value or purchase price
for each dwelling, including land, shall not exceed its appraised value. Land
or property acquired in anticipation of future use may be leased for the
interim period by the corporation for such term and rent as it deems
appropriate.

(e) Upon authorization by the legislature, the
corporation shall cause the State to issue general obligation bonds to finance:

(1) Land acquisition;

(2) The development and improvement of land;

(3) The construction of dwelling units;

(4) The purchase, lease, or rental of land and
dwelling units by qualified residents, nonprofit organizations, or government
agencies under this chapter;

(5) Payment for any services contracted for under
this chapter, including profit or recompense paid to partners, and including
community information and advocacy services deemed necessary by the corporation
to provide for citizen participation in the development of housing projects,
the implementation of this chapter, and the staffing of any citizen advisory
committee the corporation may establish;

(6) The cost of the repurchase of units under section
201H‑47;

(7) Loans for the rehabilitation and renovation of
existing housing; and

(8) Any other moneys required to accomplish the
purposes of this chapter.

(f) The corporation shall do all other things
necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter. [L 2006, c
180, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next